Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska74-1329
Act, how cited.

Sections 74-1329 to 74-1343 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Highway-Rail Grade Crossing Safety and Consolidation Act.

Laws 1997, LB 255, § 1.